Illinois, session 104th, SB1503.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Sections 8, 16, 16a, and 19 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/8)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.8)7    Sec. 8. The amount of compensation which shall be paid to 8the employee for an accidental injury not resulting in death 9is:10    (a) The employer shall provide and pay the negotiated 11rate, if applicable, or the lesser of the health care 12provider's actual charges or according to a fee schedule, 13subject to Section 8.2, in effect at the time the service was 14rendered for all the necessary first aid, medical and surgical 15services, and all necessary medical, surgical and hospital 16services thereafter incurred, limited, however, to that which 17is reasonably required to cure or relieve from the effects of 18the accidental injury, even if a health care provider sells, 19transfers, or otherwise assigns an account receivable for 20procedures, treatments, or services covered under this Act. If 21the employer does not dispute payment of first aid, medical, 22surgical, and hospital services, the employer shall make such 23payment to the provider on behalf of the employee. The   SB1503- 2 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1employer shall also pay for treatment, instruction and 2training necessary for the physical, mental and vocational 3rehabilitation of the employee, including all maintenance 4costs and expenses incidental thereto. If as a result of the 5injury the employee is unable to be self-sufficient the 6employer shall further pay for such maintenance or 7institutional care as shall be required. If a petitioner's 8claim is contested and enters arbitration proceedings pursuant 9to Section 19, the Arbitrator shall include in its award, 10pre-award interest at the rate of 6% per annum to a prevailing 11petitioner, from the date of the contested injury, provided 12that no interest shall accrue if, within 12 months after the 13date of the injury, the respondent concedes that the claim is 14compensable.15    The employee may at any time elect to secure his own 16physician, surgeon and hospital services at the employer's 17expense, or, 18    Upon agreement between the employer and the employees, or 19the employees' exclusive representative, and subject to the 20approval of the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission, the 21employer shall maintain a list of physicians, to be known as a 22Panel of Physicians, who are accessible to the employees. The 23employer shall post this list in a place or places easily 24accessible to his employees. The employee shall have the right 25to make an alternative choice of physician from such Panel if 26he is not satisfied with the physician first selected. If, due   SB1503- 3 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1to the nature of the injury or its occurrence away from the 2employer's place of business, the employee is unable to make a 3selection from the Panel, the selection process from the Panel 4shall not apply. The physician selected from the Panel may 5arrange for any consultation, referral or other specialized 6medical services outside the Panel at the employer's expense. 7Provided that, in the event the Commission shall find that a 8doctor selected by the employee is rendering improper or 9inadequate care, the Commission may order the employee to 10select another doctor certified or qualified in the medical 11field for which treatment is required. If the employee refuses 12to make such change the Commission may relieve the employer of 13his obligation to pay the doctor's charges from the date of 14refusal to the date of compliance.15    Any vocational rehabilitation counselors who provide 16service under this Act shall have appropriate certifications 17which designate the counselor as qualified to render opinions 18relating to vocational rehabilitation. Vocational 19rehabilitation may include, but is not limited to, counseling 20for job searches, supervising a job search program, and 21vocational retraining including education at an accredited 22learning institution. The employee or employer may petition to 23the Commission to decide disputes relating to vocational 24rehabilitation and the Commission shall resolve any such 25dispute, including payment of the vocational rehabilitation 26program by the employer.  SB1503- 4 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    The maintenance benefit shall not be less than the 2temporary total disability rate determined for the employee. 3In addition, maintenance shall include costs and expenses 4incidental to the vocational rehabilitation program.5    When the employee is working light duty on a part-time 6basis or full-time basis and earns less than he or she would be 7earning if employed in the full capacity of the job or jobs, 8then the employee shall be entitled to temporary partial 9disability benefits. Temporary partial disability benefits 10shall be equal to two-thirds of the difference between the 11average amount that the employee would be able to earn in the 12full performance of his or her duties in the occupation in 13which he or she was engaged at the time of accident and the 14gross amount which he or she is earning in the modified job 15provided to the employee by the employer or in any other job 16that the employee is working.17    Every hospital, physician, surgeon or other person 18rendering treatment or services in accordance with the 19provisions of this Section shall upon written request furnish 20full and complete reports thereof to, and permit their records 21to be copied by, the employer, the employee or his dependents, 22as the case may be, or any other party to any proceeding for 23compensation before the Commission, or their attorneys.24    Notwithstanding the foregoing, the employer's liability to 25pay for such medical services selected by the employee shall 26be limited to:  SB1503- 5 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        (1) all first aid and emergency treatment; plus2        (2) all medical, surgical and hospital services 3    provided by the physician, surgeon or hospital initially 4    chosen by the employee or by any other physician, 5    consultant, expert, institution or other provider of 6    services recommended by said initial service provider or 7    any subsequent provider of medical services in the chain 8    of referrals from said initial service provider; plus9        (3) all medical, surgical and hospital services 10    provided by any second physician, surgeon or hospital 11    subsequently chosen by the employee or by any other 12    physician, consultant, expert, institution or other 13    provider of services recommended by said second service 14    provider or any subsequent provider of medical services in 15    the chain of referrals from said second service provider. 16    Thereafter the employer shall select and pay for all 17    necessary medical, surgical and hospital treatment and the 18    employee may not select a provider of medical services at 19    the employer's expense unless the employer agrees to such 20    selection. At any time the employee may obtain any medical 21    treatment he desires at his own expense. This paragraph 22    shall not affect the duty to pay for rehabilitation 23    referred to above.24        (4) The following shall apply for injuries occurring 25    on or after June 28, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 26    97-18) and only when an employer has an approved preferred   SB1503- 6 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    provider program pursuant to Section 8.1a on the date the 2    employee sustained his or her accidental injuries:3            (A) The employer shall, in writing, on a form 4        promulgated by the Commission, inform the employee of 5        the preferred provider program;6            (B) Subsequent to the report of an injury by an 7        employee, the employee may choose in writing at any 8        time to decline the preferred provider program, in 9        which case that would constitute one of the two 10        choices of medical providers to which the employee is 11        entitled under subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3); and12            (C) Prior to the report of an injury by an 13        employee, when an employee chooses non-emergency 14        treatment from a provider not within the preferred 15        provider program, that would constitute the employee's 16        one choice of medical providers to which the employee 17        is entitled under subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3). 18    When an employer and employee so agree in writing, nothing 19in this Act prevents an employee whose injury or disability 20has been established under this Act, from relying in good 21faith, on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone, in 22accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized church 23or religious denomination, by a duly accredited practitioner 24thereof, and having nursing services appropriate therewith, 25without suffering loss or diminution of the compensation 26benefits under this Act. However, the employee shall submit to   SB1503- 7 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1all physical examinations required by this Act. The cost of 2such treatment and nursing care shall be paid by the employee 3unless the employer agrees to make such payment.4    Where the accidental injury results in the amputation of 5an arm, hand, leg or foot, or the enucleation of an eye, or the 6loss of any of the natural teeth, the employer shall furnish an 7artificial of any such members lost or damaged in accidental 8injury arising out of and in the course of employment, and 9shall also furnish the necessary braces in all proper and 10necessary cases. In cases of the loss of a member or members by 11amputation, the employer shall, whenever necessary, maintain 12in good repair, refit or replace the artificial limbs during 13the lifetime of the employee. Where the accidental injury 14accompanied by physical injury results in damage to a denture, 15eye glasses or contact eye lenses, or where the accidental 16injury results in damage to an artificial member, the employer 17shall replace or repair such denture, glasses, lenses, or 18artificial member.19    The furnishing by the employer of any such services or 20appliances is not an admission of liability on the part of the 21employer to pay compensation.22    The furnishing of any such services or appliances or the 23servicing thereof by the employer is not the payment of 24compensation.25    (b) If the period of temporary total incapacity for work 26lasts more than 3 working days, weekly compensation as   SB1503- 8 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1hereinafter provided shall be paid beginning on the 4th day of 2such temporary total incapacity and continuing as long as the 3total temporary incapacity lasts. In cases where the temporary 4total incapacity for work continues for a period of 14 days or 5more from the day of the accident compensation shall commence 6on the day after the accident.7        1. The compensation rate for temporary total 8    incapacity under this paragraph (b) of this Section shall 9    be equal to 66 2/3% of the employee's average weekly wage 10    computed in accordance with Section 10, provided that it 11    shall be not less than 66 2/3% of the sum of the Federal 12    minimum wage under the Fair Labor Standards Act, or the 13    Illinois minimum wage under the Minimum Wage Law, 14    whichever is more, multiplied by 40 hours. This percentage 15    rate shall be increased by 10% for each spouse and child, 16    not to exceed 100% of the total minimum wage calculation, 17    nor exceed the employee's average weekly wage computed in 18    accordance with the provisions of Section 10, whichever is 19    less.20        2. The compensation rate in all cases other than for 21    temporary total disability under this paragraph (b), and 22    other than for serious and permanent disfigurement under 23    paragraph (c) and other than for permanent partial 24    disability under subparagraph (2) of paragraph (d) or 25    under paragraph (e), of this Section shall be equal to 66 26    2/3% of the employee's average weekly wage computed in   SB1503- 9 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    accordance with the provisions of Section 10, provided 2    that it shall be not less than 66 2/3% of the sum of the 3    Federal minimum wage under the Fair Labor Standards Act, 4    or the Illinois minimum wage under the Minimum Wage Law, 5    whichever is more, multiplied by 40 hours. This percentage 6    rate shall be increased by 10% for each spouse and child, 7    not to exceed 100% of the total minimum wage calculation, 8    nor exceed the employee's average weekly wage computed in 9    accordance with the provisions of Section 10, whichever is 10    less.11        2.1. The compensation rate in all cases of serious and 12    permanent disfigurement under paragraph (c) and of 13    permanent partial disability under subparagraph (2) of 14    paragraph (d) or under paragraph (e) of this Section shall 15    be equal to 60% of the employee's average weekly wage 16    computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10, 17    provided that it shall be not less than 66 2/3% of the sum 18    of the Federal minimum wage under the Fair Labor Standards 19    Act, or the Illinois minimum wage under the Minimum Wage 20    Law, whichever is more, multiplied by 40 hours. This 21    percentage rate shall be increased by 10% for each spouse 22    and child, not to exceed 100% of the total minimum wage 23    calculation, nor exceed the employee's average weekly wage 24    computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10, 25    whichever is less.26        3. As used in this Section the term "child" means a   SB1503- 10 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    child of the employee including any child legally adopted 2    before the accident or whom at the time of the accident the 3    employee was under legal obligation to support or to whom 4    the employee stood in loco parentis, and who at the time of 5    the accident was under 18 years of age and not 6    emancipated. The term "children" means the plural of 7    "child".8        4. All weekly compensation rates provided under 9    subparagraphs 1, 2 and 2.1 of this paragraph (b) of this 10    Section shall be subject to the following limitations:11        The maximum weekly compensation rate from July 1, 12    1975, except as hereinafter provided, shall be 100% of the 13    State's average weekly wage in covered industries under 14    the Unemployment Insurance Act, that being the wage that 15    most closely approximates the State's average weekly wage.16        The maximum weekly compensation rate, for the period 17    July 1, 1984, through June 30, 1987, except as hereinafter 18    provided, shall be $293.61. Effective July 1, 1987 and on 19    July 1 of each year thereafter the maximum weekly 20    compensation rate, except as hereinafter provided, shall 21    be determined as follows: if during the preceding 12 month 22    period there shall have been an increase in the State's 23    average weekly wage in covered industries under the 24    Unemployment Insurance Act, the weekly compensation rate 25    shall be proportionately increased by the same percentage 26    as the percentage of increase in the State's average   SB1503- 11 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    weekly wage in covered industries under the Unemployment 2    Insurance Act during such period.3        The maximum weekly compensation rate, for the period 4    January 1, 1981 through December 31, 1983, except as 5    hereinafter provided, shall be 100% of the State's average 6    weekly wage in covered industries under the Unemployment 7    Insurance Act in effect on January 1, 1981. Effective 8    January 1, 1984 and on January 1, of each year thereafter 9    the maximum weekly compensation rate, except as 10    hereinafter provided, shall be determined as follows: if 11    during the preceding 12 month period there shall have been 12    an increase in the State's average weekly wage in covered 13    industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act, the 14    weekly compensation rate shall be proportionately 15    increased by the same percentage as the percentage of 16    increase in the State's average weekly wage in covered 17    industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act during 18    such period.19        From July 1, 1977 and thereafter such maximum weekly 20    compensation rate in death cases under Section 7, and 21    permanent total disability cases under paragraph (f) or 22    subparagraph 18 of paragraph (3) of this Section and for 23    temporary total disability under paragraph (b) of this 24    Section and for amputation of a member or enucleation of 25    an eye under paragraph (e) of this Section shall be 26    increased to 133-1/3% of the State's average weekly wage   SB1503- 12 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    in covered industries under the Unemployment Insurance 2    Act.3        For injuries occurring on or after February 1, 2006, 4    the maximum weekly benefit under paragraph (d)1 of this 5    Section shall be 100% of the State's average weekly wage 6    in covered industries under the Unemployment Insurance 7    Act. 8        4.1. Any provision herein to the contrary 9    notwithstanding, the weekly compensation rate for 10    compensation payments under subparagraph 18 of paragraph 11    (e) of this Section and under paragraph (f) of this 12    Section and under paragraph (a) of Section 7 and for 13    amputation of a member or enucleation of an eye under 14    paragraph (e) of this Section, shall in no event be less 15    than 50% of the State's average weekly wage in covered 16    industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act.17        4.2. Any provision to the contrary notwithstanding, 18    the total compensation payable under Section 7 shall not 19    exceed the greater of $500,000 or 25 years.20        5. For the purpose of this Section this State's 21    average weekly wage in covered industries under the 22    Unemployment Insurance Act on July 1, 1975 is hereby fixed 23    at $228.16 per week and the computation of compensation 24    rates shall be based on the aforesaid average weekly wage 25    until modified as hereinafter provided.26        6. The Department of Employment Security of the State   SB1503- 13 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    shall on or before the first day of December, 1977, and on 2    or before the first day of June, 1978, and on the first day 3    of each December and June of each year thereafter, publish 4    the State's average weekly wage in covered industries 5    under the Unemployment Insurance Act and the Illinois 6    Workers' Compensation Commission shall on the 15th day of 7    January, 1978 and on the 15th day of July, 1978 and on the 8    15th day of each January and July of each year thereafter, 9    post and publish the State's average weekly wage in 10    covered industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act as 11    last determined and published by the Department of 12    Employment Security. The amount when so posted and 13    published shall be conclusive and shall be applicable as 14    the basis of computation of compensation rates until the 15    next posting and publication as aforesaid.16        7. The payment of compensation by an employer or his 17    insurance carrier to an injured employee shall not 18    constitute an admission of the employer's liability to pay 19    compensation.20    (c) For any serious and permanent disfigurement to the 21hand, head, face, neck, arm, leg below the knee or the chest 22above the axillary line, the employee is entitled to 23compensation for such disfigurement, the amount determined by 24agreement at any time or by arbitration under this Act, at a 25hearing not less than 6 months after the date of the accidental 26injury, which amount shall not exceed 150 weeks (if the   SB1503- 14 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1accidental injury occurs on or after the effective date of 2this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly but before 3February 1, 2006) or 162 weeks (if the accidental injury 4occurs on or after February 1, 2006) at the applicable rate 5provided in subparagraph 2.1 of paragraph (b) of this Section.6    No compensation is payable under this paragraph where 7compensation is payable under paragraphs (d), (e) or (f) of 8this Section.9    A duly appointed member of a fire department in a city, the 10population of which exceeds 500,000 according to the last 11federal or State census, is eligible for compensation under 12this paragraph only where such serious and permanent 13disfigurement results from burns.14    (d) 1. If, after the accidental injury has been sustained, 15the employee as a result thereof becomes partially 16incapacitated from pursuing his usual and customary line of 17employment, he shall, except in cases compensated under the 18specific schedule set forth in paragraph (e) of this Section, 19receive compensation for the duration of his disability, 20subject to the limitations as to maximum amounts fixed in 21paragraph (b) of this Section, equal to 66-2/3% of the 22difference between the average amount which he would be able 23to earn in the full performance of his duties in the occupation 24in which he was engaged at the time of the accident and the 25average amount which he is earning or is able to earn in some 26suitable employment or business after the accident. For   SB1503- 15 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1accidental injuries that occur on or after September 1, 2011, 2an award for wage differential under this subsection shall be 3effective only until the employee reaches the age of 67 or 5 4years from the date the award becomes final, whichever is 5later. 6    2. If, as a result of the accident, the employee sustains 7serious and permanent injuries not covered by paragraphs (c) 8and (e) of this Section or having sustained injuries covered 9by the aforesaid paragraphs (c) and (e), he shall have 10sustained in addition thereto other injuries which injuries do 11not incapacitate him from pursuing the duties of his 12employment but which would disable him from pursuing other 13suitable occupations, or which have otherwise resulted in 14physical impairment; or if such injuries partially 15incapacitate him from pursuing the duties of his usual and 16customary line of employment but do not result in an 17impairment of earning capacity, or having resulted in an 18impairment of earning capacity, the employee elects to waive 19his right to recover under the foregoing subparagraph 1 of 20paragraph (d) of this Section then in any of the foregoing 21events, he shall receive in addition to compensation for 22temporary total disability under paragraph (b) of this 23Section, compensation at the rate provided in subparagraph 2.1 24of paragraph (b) of this Section for that percentage of 500 25weeks that the partial disability resulting from the injuries 26covered by this paragraph bears to total disability. If the   SB1503- 16 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1employee shall have sustained a fracture of one or more 2vertebra or fracture of the skull, the amount of compensation 3allowed under this Section shall be not less than 6 weeks for a 4fractured skull and 6 weeks for each fractured vertebra, and 5in the event the employee shall have sustained a fracture of 6any of the following facial bones: nasal, lachrymal, vomer, 7zygoma, maxilla, palatine or mandible, the amount of 8compensation allowed under this Section shall be not less than 92 weeks for each such fractured bone, and for a fracture of 10each transverse process not less than 3 weeks. In the event 11such injuries shall result in the loss of a kidney, spleen or 12lung, the amount of compensation allowed under this Section 13shall be not less than 10 weeks for each such organ. 14Compensation awarded under this subparagraph 2 shall not take 15into consideration injuries covered under paragraphs (c) and 16(e) of this Section and the compensation provided in this 17paragraph shall not affect the employee's right to 18compensation payable under paragraphs (b), (c) and (e) of this 19Section for the disabilities therein covered.20    (e) For accidental injuries in the following schedule, the 21employee shall receive compensation for the period of 22temporary total incapacity for work resulting from such 23accidental injury, under subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) of 24this Section, and shall receive in addition thereto 25compensation for a further period for the specific loss herein 26mentioned, but shall not receive any compensation under any   SB1503- 17 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1other provisions of this Act. The following listed amounts 2apply to either the loss of or the permanent and complete loss 3of use of the member specified, such compensation for the 4length of time as follows:5        1. Thumb-6            70 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 7        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 8        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 9            76 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 10        after February 1, 2006.11        2. First, or index finger-12            40 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 13        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 15            43 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 16        after February 1, 2006.17        3. Second, or middle finger-18            35 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 19        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 20        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 21            38 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 22        after February 1, 2006.23        4. Third, or ring finger-24            25 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 25        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 26        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006.   SB1503- 18 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1            27 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 2        after February 1, 2006.3        5. Fourth, or little finger-4            20 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 5        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 6        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 7            22 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 8        after February 1, 2006.9        6. Great toe-10            35 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 11        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 13            38 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 14        after February 1, 2006.15        7. Each toe other than great toe-16            12 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 17        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 18        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 19            13 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 20        after February 1, 2006.21        8. The loss of the first or distal phalanx of the thumb 22    or of any finger or toe shall be considered to be equal to 23    the loss of one-half of such thumb, finger or toe and the 24    compensation payable shall be one-half of the amount above 25    specified. The loss of more than one phalanx shall be 26    considered as the loss of the entire thumb, finger or toe.   SB1503- 19 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    In no case shall the amount received for more than one 2    finger exceed the amount provided in this schedule for the 3    loss of a hand.4        9. Hand-5            190 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 6        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 8            205 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 9        after February 1, 2006. 10            190 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 11        after June 28, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 12        97-18) and if the accidental injury involves carpal 13        tunnel syndrome due to repetitive or cumulative 14        trauma, in which case the permanent partial disability 15        shall not exceed 15% loss of use of the hand, except 16        for cause shown by clear and convincing evidence and 17        in which case the award shall not exceed 30% loss of 18        use of the hand. 19        The loss of 2 or more digits, or one or more phalanges 20    of 2 or more digits, of a hand may be compensated on the 21    basis of partial loss of use of a hand, provided, further, 22    that the loss of 4 digits, or the loss of use of 4 digits, 23    in the same hand shall constitute the complete loss of a 24    hand.25        10. Arm-26            235 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or   SB1503- 20 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 3            253 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 4        after February 1, 2006. 5        Where an accidental injury results in the amputation 6    of an arm below the elbow, such injury shall be 7    compensated as a loss of an arm. Where an accidental 8    injury results in the amputation of an arm above the 9    elbow, compensation for an additional 15 weeks (if the 10    accidental injury occurs on or after the effective date of 11    this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly but 12    before February 1, 2006) or an additional 17 weeks (if the 13    accidental injury occurs on or after February 1, 2006) 14    shall be paid, except where the accidental injury results 15    in the amputation of an arm at the shoulder joint, or so 16    close to shoulder joint that an artificial arm cannot be 17    used, or results in the disarticulation of an arm at the 18    shoulder joint, in which case compensation for an 19    additional 65 weeks (if the accidental injury occurs on or 20    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 21    94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006) or an 22    additional 70 weeks (if the accidental injury occurs on or 23    after February 1, 2006) shall be paid.24        11. Foot-25            155 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 26        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the   SB1503- 21 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 2            167 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 3        after February 1, 2006.4        12. Leg-5            200 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 6        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 8            215 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 9        after February 1, 2006. 10        Where an accidental injury results in the amputation 11    of a leg below the knee, such injury shall be compensated 12    as loss of a leg. Where an accidental injury results in the 13    amputation of a leg above the knee, compensation for an 14    additional 25 weeks (if the accidental injury occurs on or 15    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 16    94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006) or an 17    additional 27 weeks (if the accidental injury occurs on or 18    after February 1, 2006) shall be paid, except where the 19    accidental injury results in the amputation of a leg at 20    the hip joint, or so close to the hip joint that an 21    artificial leg cannot be used, or results in the 22    disarticulation of a leg at the hip joint, in which case 23    compensation for an additional 75 weeks (if the accidental 24    injury occurs on or after the effective date of this 25    amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly but before 26    February 1, 2006) or an additional 81 weeks (if the   SB1503- 22 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    accidental injury occurs on or after February 1, 2006) 2    shall be paid.3        13. Eye-4            150 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 5        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 6        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 7            162 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 8        after February 1, 2006. 9        Where an accidental injury results in the enucleation 10    of an eye, compensation for an additional 10 weeks (if the 11    accidental injury occurs on or after the effective date of 12    this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly but 13    before February 1, 2006) or an additional 11 weeks (if the 14    accidental injury occurs on or after February 1, 2006) 15    shall be paid.16        14. Loss of hearing of one ear-17            50 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 18        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 19        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 20            54 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 21        after February 1, 2006. 22        Total and permanent loss of hearing of both ears-23            200 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 24        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 25        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006.26            215 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or   SB1503- 23 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        after February 1, 2006.2        15. Testicle-3            50 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 4        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 5        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 6            54 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 7        after February 1, 2006. 8        Both testicles-9            150 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 10        after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 11        94th General Assembly but before February 1, 2006. 12            162 weeks if the accidental injury occurs on or 13        after February 1, 2006.14        16. For the permanent partial loss of use of a member 15    or sight of an eye, or hearing of an ear, compensation 16    during that proportion of the number of weeks in the 17    foregoing schedule provided for the loss of such member or 18    sight of an eye, or hearing of an ear, which the partial 19    loss of use thereof bears to the total loss of use of such 20    member, or sight of eye, or hearing of an ear.21            (a) Loss of hearing for compensation purposes 22        shall be confined to the frequencies of 1,000, 2,000 23        and 3,000 cycles per second. Loss of hearing ability 24        for frequency tones above 3,000 cycles per second are 25        not to be considered as constituting disability for 26        hearing.  SB1503- 24 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1            (b) The percent of hearing loss, for purposes of 2        the determination of compensation claims for 3        occupational deafness, shall be calculated as the 4        average in decibels for the thresholds of hearing for 5        the frequencies of 1,000, 2,000 and 3,000 cycles per 6        second. Pure tone air conduction audiometric 7        instruments, approved by nationally recognized 8        authorities in this field, shall be used for measuring 9        hearing loss. If the losses of hearing average 30 10        decibels or less in the 3 frequencies, such losses of 11        hearing shall not then constitute any compensable 12        hearing disability. If the losses of hearing average 13        85 decibels or more in the 3 frequencies, then the same 14        shall constitute and be total or 100% compensable 15        hearing loss.16            (c) In measuring hearing impairment, the lowest 17        measured losses in each of the 3 frequencies shall be 18        added together and divided by 3 to determine the 19        average decibel loss. For every decibel of loss 20        exceeding 30 decibels an allowance of 1.82% shall be 21        made up to the maximum of 100% which is reached at 85 22        decibels.23            (d) If a hearing loss is established to have 24        existed on July 1, 1975 by audiometric testing the 25        employer shall not be liable for the previous loss so 26        established nor shall he be liable for any loss for   SB1503- 25 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        which compensation has been paid or awarded.2            (e) No consideration shall be given to the 3        question of whether or not the ability of an employee 4        to understand speech is improved by the use of a 5        hearing aid.6            (f) No claim for loss of hearing due to industrial 7        noise shall be brought against an employer or allowed 8        unless the employee has been exposed for a period of 9        time sufficient to cause permanent impairment to noise 10        levels in excess of the following: 11Sound Level DBA12Slow ResponseHours Per Day13908149261595416973171002181021-1/2191051201101/2211151/422        This subparagraph (f) shall not be applied in cases of 23    hearing loss resulting from trauma or explosion.24        17. In computing the compensation to be paid to any 25    employee who, before the accident for which he claims 26    compensation, had before that time sustained an injury   SB1503- 26 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    resulting in the loss by amputation or partial loss by 2    amputation of any member, including hand, arm, thumb or 3    fingers, leg, foot or any toes, such loss or partial loss 4    of any such member shall be deducted from any award made 5    for the subsequent injury. For the permanent loss of use 6    or the permanent partial loss of use of any such member or 7    the partial loss of sight of an eye, for which 8    compensation has been paid, then such loss shall be taken 9    into consideration and deducted from any award for the 10    subsequent injury.11        18. The specific case of loss of both hands, both 12    arms, or both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or of any 13    two thereof, or the permanent and complete loss of the use 14    thereof, constitutes total and permanent disability, to be 15    compensated according to the compensation fixed by 16    paragraph (f) of this Section. These specific cases of 17    total and permanent disability do not exclude other cases.18        Any employee who has previously suffered the loss or 19    permanent and complete loss of the use of any of such 20    members, and in a subsequent independent accident loses 21    another or suffers the permanent and complete loss of the 22    use of any one of such members the employer for whom the 23    injured employee is working at the time of the last 24    independent accident is liable to pay compensation only 25    for the loss or permanent and complete loss of the use of 26    the member occasioned by the last independent accident.  SB1503- 27 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        19. In a case of specific loss and the subsequent 2    death of such injured employee from other causes than such 3    injury leaving a widow, widower, or dependents surviving 4    before payment or payment in full for such injury, then 5    the amount due for such injury is payable to the widow or 6    widower and, if there be no widow or widower, then to such 7    dependents, in the proportion which such dependency bears 8    to total dependency.9    Beginning July 1, 1980, and every 6 months thereafter, the 10Commission shall examine the Second Injury Fund and when, 11after deducting all advances or loans made to such Fund, the 12amount therein is $500,000 then the amount required to be paid 13by employers pursuant to paragraph (f) of Section 7 shall be 14reduced by one-half. When the Second Injury Fund reaches the 15sum of $600,000 then the payments shall cease entirely. 16However, when the Second Injury Fund has been reduced to 17$400,000, payment of one-half of the amounts required by 18paragraph (f) of Section 7 shall be resumed, in the manner 19herein provided, and when the Second Injury Fund has been 20reduced to $300,000, payment of the full amounts required by 21paragraph (f) of Section 7 shall be resumed, in the manner 22herein provided. The Commission shall make the changes in 23payment effective by general order, and the changes in payment 24become immediately effective for all cases coming before the 25Commission thereafter either by settlement agreement or final 26order, irrespective of the date of the accidental injury.  SB1503- 28 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    On August 1, 1996 and on February 1 and August 1 of each 2subsequent year, the Commission shall examine the special fund 3designated as the "Rate Adjustment Fund" and when, after 4deducting all advances or loans made to said fund, the amount 5therein is $4,000,000, the amount required to be paid by 6employers pursuant to paragraph (f) of Section 7 shall be 7reduced by one-half. When the Rate Adjustment Fund reaches the 8sum of $5,000,000 the payment therein shall cease entirely. 9However, when said Rate Adjustment Fund has been reduced to 10$3,000,000 the amounts required by paragraph (f) of Section 7 11shall be resumed in the manner herein provided.12    (f) In case of complete disability, which renders the 13employee wholly and permanently incapable of work, or in the 14specific case of total and permanent disability as provided in 15subparagraph 18 of paragraph (e) of this Section, compensation 16shall be payable at the rate provided in subparagraph 2 of 17paragraph (b) of this Section for life.18    An employee entitled to benefits under paragraph (f) of 19this Section shall also be entitled to receive from the Rate 20Adjustment Fund provided in paragraph (f) of Section 7 of the 21supplementary benefits provided in paragraph (g) of this 22Section 8.23    If any employee who receives an award under this paragraph 24afterwards returns to work or is able to do so, and earns or is 25able to earn as much as before the accident, payments under 26such award shall cease. If such employee returns to work, or is   SB1503- 29 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1able to do so, and earns or is able to earn part but not as 2much as before the accident, such award shall be modified so as 3to conform to an award under paragraph (d) of this Section. If 4such award is terminated or reduced under the provisions of 5this paragraph, such employees have the right at any time 6within 30 months after the date of such termination or 7reduction to file petition with the Commission for the purpose 8of determining whether any disability exists as a result of 9the original accidental injury and the extent thereof.10    Disability as enumerated in subdivision 18, paragraph (e) 11of this Section is considered complete disability.12    If an employee who had previously incurred loss or the 13permanent and complete loss of use of one member, through the 14loss or the permanent and complete loss of the use of one hand, 15one arm, one foot, one leg, or one eye, incurs permanent and 16complete disability through the loss or the permanent and 17complete loss of the use of another member, he shall receive, 18in addition to the compensation payable by the employer and 19after such payments have ceased, an amount from the Second 20Injury Fund provided for in paragraph (f) of Section 7, which, 21together with the compensation payable from the employer in 22whose employ he was when the last accidental injury was 23incurred, will equal the amount payable for permanent and 24complete disability as provided in this paragraph of this 25Section.26    The custodian of the Second Injury Fund provided for in   SB1503- 30 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1paragraph (f) of Section 7 shall be joined with the employer as 2a party respondent in the application for adjustment of claim. 3The application for adjustment of claim shall state briefly 4and in general terms the approximate time and place and manner 5of the loss of the first member.6    In its award the Commission or the Arbitrator shall 7specifically find the amount the injured employee shall be 8weekly paid, the number of weeks compensation which shall be 9paid by the employer, the date upon which payments begin out of 10the Second Injury Fund provided for in paragraph (f) of 11Section 7 of this Act, the length of time the weekly payments 12continue, the date upon which the pension payments commence 13and the monthly amount of the payments. The Commission shall 1430 days after the date upon which payments out of the Second 15Injury Fund have begun as provided in the award, and every 16month thereafter, prepare and submit to the State Comptroller 17a voucher for payment for all compensation accrued to that 18date at the rate fixed by the Commission. The State 19Comptroller shall draw a warrant to the injured employee along 20with a receipt to be executed by the injured employee and 21returned to the Commission. The endorsed warrant and receipt 22is a full and complete acquittance to the Commission for the 23payment out of the Second Injury Fund. No other appropriation 24or warrant is necessary for payment out of the Second Injury 25Fund. The Second Injury Fund is appropriated for the purpose 26of making payments according to the terms of the awards.  SB1503- 31 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    As of July 1, 1980 to July 1, 1982, all claims against and 2obligations of the Second Injury Fund shall become claims 3against and obligations of the Rate Adjustment Fund to the 4extent there is insufficient money in the Second Injury Fund 5to pay such claims and obligations. In that case, all 6references to "Second Injury Fund" in this Section shall also 7include the Rate Adjustment Fund.8    (g) Every award for permanent total disability entered by 9the Commission on and after July 1, 1965 under which 10compensation payments shall become due and payable after the 11effective date of this amendatory Act, and every award for 12death benefits or permanent total disability entered by the 13Commission on and after the effective date of this amendatory 14Act shall be subject to annual adjustments as to the amount of 15the compensation rate therein provided. Such adjustments shall 16first be made on July 15, 1977, and all awards made and entered 17prior to July 1, 1975 and on July 15 of each year thereafter. 18In all other cases such adjustment shall be made on July 15 of 19the second year next following the date of the entry of the 20award and shall further be made on July 15 annually 21thereafter. If during the intervening period from the date of 22the entry of the award, or the last periodic adjustment, there 23shall have been an increase in the State's average weekly wage 24in covered industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act, 25the weekly compensation rate shall be proportionately 26increased by the same percentage as the percentage of increase   SB1503- 32 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1in the State's average weekly wage in covered industries under 2the Unemployment Insurance Act. The increase in the 3compensation rate under this paragraph shall in no event bring 4the total compensation rate to an amount greater than the 5prevailing maximum rate at the time that the annual adjustment 6is made. Such increase shall be paid in the same manner as 7herein provided for payments under the Second Injury Fund to 8the injured employee, or his dependents, as the case may be, 9out of the Rate Adjustment Fund provided in paragraph (f) of 10Section 7 of this Act. Payments shall be made at the same 11intervals as provided in the award or, at the option of the 12Commission, may be made in quarterly payment on the 15th day of 13January, April, July and October of each year. In the event of 14a decrease in such average weekly wage there shall be no change 15in the then existing compensation rate. The within paragraph 16shall not apply to cases where there is disputed liability and 17in which a compromise lump sum settlement between the employer 18and the injured employee, or his dependents, as the case may 19be, has been duly approved by the Illinois Workers' 20Compensation Commission.21    Provided, that in cases of awards entered by the 22Commission for injuries occurring before July 1, 1975, the 23increases in the compensation rate adjusted under the 24foregoing provision of this paragraph (g) shall be limited to 25increases in the State's average weekly wage in covered 26industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act occurring   SB1503- 33 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1after July 1, 1975.2    For every accident occurring on or after July 20, 2005 but 3before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th 4General Assembly (Senate Bill 1283 of the 94th General 5Assembly), the annual adjustments to the compensation rate in 6awards for death benefits or permanent total disability, as 7provided in this Act, shall be paid by the employer. The 8adjustment shall be made by the employer on July 15 of the 9second year next following the date of the entry of the award 10and shall further be made on July 15 annually thereafter. If 11during the intervening period from the date of the entry of the 12award, or the last periodic adjustment, there shall have been 13an increase in the State's average weekly wage in covered 14industries under the Unemployment Insurance Act, the employer 15shall increase the weekly compensation rate proportionately by 16the same percentage as the percentage of increase in the 17State's average weekly wage in covered industries under the 18Unemployment Insurance Act. The increase in the compensation 19rate under this paragraph shall in no event bring the total 20compensation rate to an amount greater than the prevailing 21maximum rate at the time that the annual adjustment is made. In 22the event of a decrease in such average weekly wage there shall 23be no change in the then existing compensation rate. Such 24increase shall be paid by the employer in the same manner and 25at the same intervals as the payment of compensation in the 26award. This paragraph shall not apply to cases where there is   SB1503- 34 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1disputed liability and in which a compromise lump sum 2settlement between the employer and the injured employee, or 3his or her dependents, as the case may be, has been duly 4approved by the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission.5    The annual adjustments for every award of death benefits 6or permanent total disability involving accidents occurring 7before July 20, 2005 and accidents occurring on or after the 8effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 9Assembly (Senate Bill 1283 of the 94th General Assembly) shall 10continue to be paid from the Rate Adjustment Fund pursuant to 11this paragraph and Section 7(f) of this Act. 12    (h) In case death occurs from any cause before the total 13compensation to which the employee would have been entitled 14has been paid, then in case the employee leaves any widow, 15widower, child, parent (or any grandchild, grandparent or 16other lineal heir or any collateral heir dependent at the time 17of the accident upon the earnings of the employee to the extent 18of 50% or more of total dependency) such compensation shall be 19paid to the beneficiaries of the deceased employee and 20distributed as provided in paragraph (g) of Section 7.21    (h-1) In case an injured employee is under legal 22disability at the time when any right or privilege accrues to 23him or her under this Act, a guardian may be appointed pursuant 24to law, and may, on behalf of such person under legal 25disability, claim and exercise any such right or privilege 26with the same effect as if the employee himself or herself had   SB1503- 35 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1claimed or exercised the right or privilege. No limitations of 2time provided by this Act run so long as the employee who is 3under legal disability is without a conservator or guardian.4    (i) In case the injured employee is under 16 years of age 5at the time of the accident and is illegally employed, the 6amount of compensation payable under paragraphs (b), (c), (d), 7(e) and (f) of this Section is increased 50%.8    However, where an employer has on file an employment 9certificate issued pursuant to the Child Labor Law of 2024 or 10work permit issued pursuant to the Federal Fair Labor 11Standards Act, as amended, or a birth certificate properly and 12duly issued, such certificate, permit or birth certificate is 13conclusive evidence as to the age of the injured minor 14employee for the purposes of this Section.15    Nothing herein contained repeals or amends the provisions 16of the Child Labor Law of 2024 relating to the employment of 17minors under the age of 16 years.18    (j) 1. In the event the injured employee receives 19benefits, including medical, surgical or hospital benefits 20under any group plan covering non-occupational disabilities 21contributed to wholly or partially by the employer, which 22benefits should not have been payable if any rights of 23recovery existed under this Act, then such amounts so paid to 24the employee from any such group plan as shall be consistent 25with, and limited to, the provisions of paragraph 2 hereof, 26shall be credited to or against any compensation payment for   SB1503- 36 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1temporary total incapacity for work or any medical, surgical 2or hospital benefits made or to be made under this Act. In such 3event, the period of time for giving notice of accidental 4injury and filing application for adjustment of claim does not 5commence to run until the termination of such payments. This 6paragraph does not apply to payments made under any group plan 7which would have been payable irrespective of an accidental 8injury under this Act. Any employer receiving such credit 9shall keep such employee safe and harmless from any and all 10claims or liabilities that may be made against him by reason of 11having received such payments only to the extent of such 12credit.13    Any excess benefits paid to or on behalf of a State 14employee by the State Employees' Retirement System under 15Article 14 of the Illinois Pension Code on a death claim or 16disputed disability claim shall be credited against any 17payments made or to be made by the State of Illinois to or on 18behalf of such employee under this Act, except for payments 19for medical expenses which have already been incurred at the 20time of the award. The State of Illinois shall directly 21reimburse the State Employees' Retirement System to the extent 22of such credit.23    2. Nothing contained in this Act shall be construed to 24give the employer or the insurance carrier the right to credit 25for any benefits or payments received by the employee other 26than compensation payments provided by this Act, and where the   SB1503- 37 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1employee receives payments other than compensation payments, 2whether as full or partial salary, group insurance benefits, 3bonuses, annuities or any other payments, the employer or 4insurance carrier shall receive credit for each such payment 5only to the extent of the compensation that would have been 6payable during the period covered by such payment.7    3. The extension of time for the filing of an Application 8for Adjustment of Claim as provided in paragraph 1 above shall 9not apply to those cases where the time for such filing had 10expired prior to the date on which payments or benefits 11enumerated herein have been initiated or resumed. Provided 12however that this paragraph 3 shall apply only to cases 13wherein the payments or benefits hereinabove enumerated shall 14be received after July 1, 1969.15(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25.) 16    (820 ILCS 305/16)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.16)17    Sec. 16. The Commission shall make and publish procedural 18rules and orders for carrying out the duties imposed upon it by 19law and for determining the extent of disability sustained, 20which rules and orders shall be deemed prima facie reasonable 21and valid.22    The process and procedure before the Commission shall be 23as simple and summary as reasonably may be.24    The Commission upon application of either party may issue 25dedimus potestatem directed to a commissioner, notary public,   SB1503- 38 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1justice of the peace or any other officer authorized by law to 2administer oaths, to take the depositions of such witness or 3witnesses as may be necessary in the judgment of such 4applicant. The non-prevailing party is responsible for any 5costs incurred in deposing a medical practitioner. Such 6dedimus potestatem may issue to any of the officers aforesaid 7in any state or territory of the United States. When the 8deposition of any witness resident of a foreign country is 9desired to be taken, the dedimus shall be directed to and the 10deposition taken before a consul, vice consul or other 11authorized representative of the government of the United 12States of America, whose station is in the country where the 13witness whose deposition is to be taken resides. In countries 14where the government of the United States has no consul or 15other diplomatic representative, then depositions in such case 16shall be taken through the appropriate judicial authority of 17that country; or where treaties provide for other methods of 18taking depositions, then the same may be taken as in such 19treaties provided. The Commission shall have the power to 20adopt necessary rules to govern the issue of such dedimus 21potestatem.22    The Commission, or any member thereof, or any Arbitrator 23designated by the Commission shall have the power to 24administer oaths, subpoena and examine witnesses; to issue 25subpoenas duces tecum, requiring the production of such books, 26papers, records and documents as may be evidence of any matter   SB1503- 39 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1under inquiry and to examine and inspect the same and such 2places or premises as may relate to the question in dispute. 3The Commission, or any member thereof, or any Arbitrator 4designated by the Commission, shall on written request of 5either party to the dispute, issue subpoenas for the 6attendance of such witnesses and production of such books, 7papers, records and documents as shall be designated in the 8applications, and the parties applying for such subpoena shall 9advance the officer and witness fees provided for in civil 10actions pending in circuit courts of this State, except as 11otherwise provided by Section 20 of this Act. Service of such 12subpoena shall be made by any sheriff or other person. In case 13any person refuses to comply with an order of the Commission or 14subpoenas issued by it or by any member thereof, or any 15Arbitrator designated by the Commission or to permit an 16inspection of places or premises, or to produce any books, 17papers, records or documents, or any witness refuses to 18testify to any matters regarding which he or she may be 19lawfully interrogated, the Circuit Court of the county in 20which the hearing or matter is pending, on application of any 21member of the Commission or any Arbitrator designated by the 22Commission, shall compel obedience by attachment proceedings, 23as for contempt, as in a case of disobedience of the 24requirements of a subpoena from such court on a refusal to 25testify therein.26    The records, reports, and bills kept by a treating   SB1503- 40 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1hospital, treating physician, or other treating healthcare 2provider that renders treatment to the employee as a result of 3accidental injuries in question, certified to as true and 4correct by the hospital, physician, or other healthcare 5provider or by designated agents of the hospital, physician, 6or other healthcare provider, showing the medical and surgical 7treatment given an injured employee by such hospital, 8physician, or other healthcare provider, shall be admissible 9without any further proof as evidence of the medical and 10surgical matters stated therein, but shall not be conclusive 11proof of such matters. There shall be a rebuttable presumption 12that any such records, reports, and bills received in response 13to Commission subpoena are certified to be true and correct. 14This paragraph does not restrict, limit, or prevent the 15admissibility of records, reports, or bills that are otherwise 16admissible. This provision does not apply to reports prepared 17by treating providers for use in litigation. 18    The Commission at its expense shall provide an official 19court reporter to take the testimony and record of proceedings 20at the hearings before an Arbitrator or the Commission, who 21shall furnish a transcript of such testimony or proceedings to 22either party requesting it, upon payment therefor at the rate 23of $1.00 per page for the original and 35 cents per page for 24each copy of such transcript. Payment for photostatic copies 25of exhibits shall be extra. If the Commission has determined, 26as provided in Section 20 of this Act, that the employee is a   SB1503- 41 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1poor person, a transcript of such testimony and proceedings, 2including photostatic copies of exhibits, shall be furnished 3to such employee at the Commission's expense. 4    The Commission shall have the power to determine the 5reasonableness and fix the amount of any fee of compensation 6charged by any person, including attorneys, physicians, 7surgeons and hospitals, for any service performed in 8connection with this Act, or for which payment is to be made 9under this Act or rendered in securing any right under this 10Act.11    Whenever the Commission shall find that the employer, his 12or her agent, service company or insurance carrier has been 13guilty of delay or unfairness towards an employee in the 14adjustment, settlement or payment of benefits due such 15employee within the purview of the provisions of paragraph (c) 16of Section 4 of this Act; or has been guilty of unreasonable or 17vexatious delay, intentional under-payment of compensation 18benefits, or has engaged in frivolous defenses which do not 19present a real controversy, within the purview of the 20provisions of paragraph (k) of Section 19 of this Act, the 21Commission shall may assess all or any part of the attorney's 22fees and costs against such employer and his or her insurance 23carrier.24(Source: P.A. 94-277, eff. 7-20-05.) 25    (820 ILCS 305/16a)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.16a)  SB1503- 42 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    Sec. 16a. (A) In the establishment or approval of 2attorney's fees in relation to claims brought under this Act, 3the Commission shall be guided by the provisions of this 4Section and by the legislative intent, hereby declared, to 5encourage settlement and prompt administrative handling of 6such claims and thereby reduce expenses to claimants for 7compensation under this Act.8    (B) With respect to any and all proceedings in connection 9with any initial or original claim under this Act, no claim of 10any attorney for services rendered in connection with the 11securing of compensation for an employee or his dependents, 12whether secured by agreement, order, award or a judgment in 13any court shall exceed 20% of the amount of compensation 14recovered and paid, unless further fees shall be allowed to 15the attorney upon a hearing by the Commission fixing fees, and 16subject to the other provisions of this Section. However, 17except as hereinafter provided in this Section, in death 18cases, total disability cases and partial disability cases, 19the amount of an attorney's fees shall not exceed 20% of the 20sum which would be due under this Act for 364 weeks of 21permanent total disability based upon the employee's average 22gross weekly wage prior to the date of the accident and subject 23to the maximum weekly benefits provided in this Act unless 24further fees shall be allowed to the attorney upon a hearing by 25the Commission fixing fees.26    (C) All attorneys' fees in connection with the initial or   SB1503- 43 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1original claim for compensation shall be fixed pursuant to a 2written contract on forms prescribed by the Commission between 3the attorney and the employee or his dependents, and every 4attorney, whether the disposition of the original claim is by 5agreement, settlement, award, judgment or otherwise, shall 6file his contract with the Chairman of the Commission who 7shall approve the contract only if it is in accordance with all 8provisions of this Section.9    (D) No attorneys' fees shall be charged with respect to 10compensation for undisputed medical expenses.11    (E) No attorneys' fees shall be charged in connection with 12any temporary total disability compensation unless the payment 13of such compensation in a timely manner or in the proper amount 14is refused, or unless such compensation is terminated by the 15employer and the payment of such compensation is obtained or 16reinstated by the efforts of the attorney, whether by 17agreement, settlement, award or judgment.18    (F) In the following cases in which there is no dispute 19between the parties as to the liability of the respondent to 20pay compensation in a timely manner or in the proper amount and 21there is no dispute that the accident has resulted in:22        (1) the death of the employee; or23        (2) a statutory permanent disability; or24        (3) the amputation of a finger, toe, or member; or25        (4) the removal of a testicle; or26        (5) the enucleation of or 100% loss of vision of an   SB1503- 44 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    eye;2the legal fees, if any, for services rendered are to be fixed 3by the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission at a nominal 4amount, not exceeding $100.5    (G) In the following cases in which there is no dispute 6between the parties as to the liability of the respondent to 7pay compensation and there is no dispute that the accident has 8resulted in:9        (1) a fracture of one or more vertebrae; or10        (2) a skull fracture; or11        (3) a fracture of one or more spinous or transverse 12    processes; or13        (4) a fracture of one or more facial bones; or14        (5) the removal of a kidney, spleen or lung;15the legal fees, if any, for services rendered are to be fixed 16by the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission at a nominal 17amount, not exceeding $100, provided that the employee is 18awarded the minimum amount for the above injuries as specified 19in Section 8(d)2.20    (H) With regard to any claim where the amount to be paid 21for compensation does not exceed the written offer made to the 22claimant or claimants by the employer or his agent prior to 23representation by an attorney, no fees shall be paid to any 24such attorney.25    (I) All attorneys' fees for representation of an employee 26or his dependents shall be the responsibility of the   SB1503- 45 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1non-prevailing employer only recoverable from compensation 2actually paid to such employee or dependents.3    (J) Any and all disputes regarding attorneys' fees, 4whether such disputes relate to which one or more attorneys 5represents the claimant or claimants or is entitled to the 6attorneys' fees, or a division of attorneys' fees where the 7claimant or claimants are or have been represented by more 8than one attorney, or any other disputes concerning attorneys' 9fees or contracts for attorneys' fees, shall be heard and 10determined by the Commission after reasonable notice to all 11interested parties and attorneys.12    (K) After reasonable notice and hearing before the 13Commission, any attorney found to be in violation of any 14provision of this Section shall be required to make 15restitution of any excess fees charged plus interest at a 16reasonable rate as determined by the Commission.17(Source: P.A. 93-721, eff. 1-1-05.) 18    (820 ILCS 305/19)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.19)19    Sec. 19. Any disputed questions of law or fact shall be 20determined as herein provided.21    (a) It shall be the duty of the Commission upon 22notification that the parties have failed to reach an 23agreement, to designate an Arbitrator.24        1. Whenever any claimant misconceives his remedy and 25    files an application for adjustment of claim under this   SB1503- 46 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    Act and it is subsequently discovered, at any time before 2    final disposition of such cause, that the claim for 3    disability or death which was the basis for such 4    application should properly have been made under the 5    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, then the provisions of 6    Section 19, paragraph (a-1) of the Workers' Occupational 7    Diseases Act having reference to such application shall 8    apply.9        2. Whenever any claimant misconceives his remedy and 10    files an application for adjustment of claim under the 11    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act and it is subsequently 12    discovered, at any time before final disposition of such 13    cause that the claim for injury or death which was the 14    basis for such application should properly have been made 15    under this Act, then the application so filed under the 16    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act may be amended in form, 17    substance or both to assert claim for such disability or 18    death under this Act and it shall be deemed to have been so 19    filed as amended on the date of the original filing 20    thereof, and such compensation may be awarded as is 21    warranted by the whole evidence pursuant to this Act. When 22    such amendment is submitted, further or additional 23    evidence may be heard by the Arbitrator or Commission when 24    deemed necessary. Nothing in this Section contained shall 25    be construed to be or permit a waiver of any provisions of 26    this Act with reference to notice but notice if given   SB1503- 47 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    shall be deemed to be a notice under the provisions of this 2    Act if given within the time required herein.3    (b) The Arbitrator shall make such inquiries and 4investigations as he or they shall deem necessary and may 5examine and inspect all books, papers, records, places, or 6premises relating to the questions in dispute and hear such 7proper evidence as the parties may submit.8    The hearings before the Arbitrator shall be held in the 9vicinity where the injury occurred after 10 days' notice of 10the time and place of such hearing shall have been given to 11each of the parties or their attorneys of record.12    The Arbitrator may find that the disabling condition is 13temporary and has not yet reached a permanent condition and 14may order the payment of compensation up to the date of the 15hearing, which award shall be reviewable and enforceable in 16the same manner as other awards, and in no instance be a bar to 17a further hearing and determination of a further amount of 18temporary total compensation or of compensation for permanent 19disability, but shall be conclusive as to all other questions 20except the nature and extent of said disability.21    The decision of the Arbitrator shall be filed with the 22Commission which Commission shall immediately send to each 23party or his attorney a copy of such decision, together with a 24notification of the time when it was filed. As of the effective 25date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, all 26decisions of the Arbitrator shall set forth in writing   SB1503- 48 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated, if 2requested by either party. Unless a petition for review is 3filed by either party within 30 days after the receipt by such 4party of the copy of the decision and notification of time when 5filed, and unless such party petitioning for a review shall 6within 35 days after the receipt by him of the copy of the 7decision, file with the Commission either an agreed statement 8of the facts appearing upon the hearing before the Arbitrator, 9or if such party shall so elect a correct transcript of 10evidence of the proceedings at such hearings, then the 11decision shall become the decision of the Commission and in 12the absence of fraud shall be conclusive. The Petition for 13Review shall contain a statement of the petitioning party's 14specific exceptions to the decision of the arbitrator. The 15jurisdiction of the Commission to review the decision of the 16arbitrator shall not be limited to the exceptions stated in 17the Petition for Review. The Commission, or any member 18thereof, may grant further time not exceeding 30 days, in 19which to file such agreed statement or transcript of evidence. 20Such agreed statement of facts or correct transcript of 21evidence, as the case may be, shall be authenticated by the 22signatures of the parties or their attorneys, and in the event 23they do not agree as to the correctness of the transcript of 24evidence it shall be authenticated by the signature of the 25Arbitrator designated by the Commission.26    Whether the employee is working or not, if the employee is   SB1503- 49 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1not receiving or has not received medical, surgical, or 2hospital services or other services or compensation as 3provided in paragraph (a) of Section 8, or compensation as 4provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8, the employee may at any 5time petition for an expedited hearing by an Arbitrator on the 6issue of whether or not he or she is entitled to receive 7payment of the services or compensation. Provided the employer 8continues to pay compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of 9Section 8, the employer may at any time petition for an 10expedited hearing on the issue of whether or not the employee 11is entitled to receive medical, surgical, or hospital services 12or other services or compensation as provided in paragraph (a) 13of Section 8, or compensation as provided in paragraph (b) of 14Section 8. When an employer has petitioned for an expedited 15hearing, the employer shall continue to pay compensation as 16provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8 unless the arbitrator 17renders a decision that the employee is not entitled to the 18benefits that are the subject of the expedited hearing or 19unless the employee's treating physician has released the 20employee to return to work at his or her regular job with the 21employer or the employee actually returns to work at any other 22job. If the arbitrator renders a decision that the employee is 23not entitled to the benefits that are the subject of the 24expedited hearing, a petition for review filed by the employee 25shall receive the same priority as if the employee had filed a 26petition for an expedited hearing by an Arbitrator. Neither   SB1503- 50 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1party shall be entitled to an expedited hearing when the 2employee has returned to work and the sole issue in dispute 3amounts to less than 12 weeks of unpaid compensation pursuant 4to paragraph (b) of Section 8.5    Expedited hearings shall have priority over all other 6petitions and shall be heard by the Arbitrator and Commission 7with all convenient speed. Any party requesting an expedited 8hearing shall give notice of a request for an expedited 9hearing under this paragraph. A copy of the Application for 10Adjustment of Claim shall be attached to the notice. The 11Commission shall adopt rules and procedures under which the 12final decision of the Commission under this paragraph is filed 13not later than 180 days from the date that the Petition for 14Review is filed with the Commission.15    Where 2 or more insurance carriers, private self-insureds, 16or a group workers' compensation pool under Article V 3/4 of 17the Illinois Insurance Code dispute coverage for the same 18injury, any such insurance carrier, private self-insured, or 19group workers' compensation pool may request an expedited 20hearing pursuant to this paragraph to determine the issue of 21coverage, provided coverage is the only issue in dispute and 22all other issues are stipulated and agreed to and further 23provided that all compensation benefits including medical 24benefits pursuant to Section 8(a) continue to be paid to or on 25behalf of petitioner. Any insurance carrier, private 26self-insured, or group workers' compensation pool that is   SB1503- 51 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1determined to be liable for coverage for the injury in issue 2shall reimburse any insurance carrier, private self-insured, 3or group workers' compensation pool that has paid benefits to 4or on behalf of petitioner for the injury. 5    (b-1) If the employee is not receiving medical, surgical 6or hospital services as provided in paragraph (a) of Section 8 7or compensation as provided in paragraph (b) of Section 8, the 8employee, in accordance with Commission Rules, may file a 9petition for an emergency hearing by an Arbitrator on the 10issue of whether or not he is entitled to receive payment of 11such compensation or services as provided therein. Such 12petition shall have priority over all other petitions and 13shall be heard by the Arbitrator and Commission with all 14convenient speed.15    Such petition shall contain the following information and 16shall be served on the employer at least 15 days before it is 17filed:18        (i) the date and approximate time of accident;19        (ii) the approximate location of the accident;20        (iii) a description of the accident;21        (iv) the nature of the injury incurred by the 22    employee;23        (v) the identity of the person, if known, to whom the 24    accident was reported and the date on which it was 25    reported;26        (vi) the name and title of the person, if known,   SB1503- 52 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    representing the employer with whom the employee conferred 2    in any effort to obtain compensation pursuant to paragraph 3    (b) of Section 8 of this Act or medical, surgical or 4    hospital services pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 5    of this Act and the date of such conference;6        (vii) a statement that the employer has refused to pay 7    compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section 8 of 8    this Act or for medical, surgical or hospital services 9    pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 of this Act;10        (viii) the name and address, if known, of each witness 11    to the accident and of each other person upon whom the 12    employee will rely to support his allegations;13        (ix) the dates of treatment related to the accident by 14    medical practitioners, and the names and addresses of such 15    practitioners, including the dates of treatment related to 16    the accident at any hospitals and the names and addresses 17    of such hospitals, and a signed authorization permitting 18    the employer to examine all medical records of all 19    practitioners and hospitals named pursuant to this 20    paragraph;21        (x) a copy of a signed report by a medical 22    practitioner, relating to the employee's current inability 23    to return to work because of the injuries incurred as a 24    result of the accident or such other documents or 25    affidavits which show that the employee is entitled to 26    receive compensation pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section   SB1503- 53 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    8 of this Act or medical, surgical or hospital services 2    pursuant to paragraph (a) of Section 8 of this Act. Such 3    reports, documents or affidavits shall state, if possible, 4    the history of the accident given by the employee, and 5    describe the injury and medical diagnosis, the medical 6    services for such injury which the employee has received 7    and is receiving, the physical activities which the 8    employee cannot currently perform as a result of any 9    impairment or disability due to such injury, and the 10    prognosis for recovery;11        (xi) complete copies of any reports, records, 12    documents and affidavits in the possession of the employee 13    on which the employee will rely to support his 14    allegations, provided that the employer shall pay the 15    reasonable cost of reproduction thereof;16        (xii) a list of any reports, records, documents and 17    affidavits which the employee has demanded by subpoena and 18    on which he intends to rely to support his allegations;19        (xiii) a certification signed by the employee or his 20    representative that the employer has received the petition 21    with the required information 15 days before filing.22    Fifteen days after receipt by the employer of the petition 23with the required information the employee may file said 24petition and required information and shall serve notice of 25the filing upon the employer. The employer may file a motion 26addressed to the sufficiency of the petition. If an objection   SB1503- 54 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1has been filed to the sufficiency of the petition, the 2arbitrator shall rule on the objection within 2 working days. 3If such an objection is filed, the time for filing the final 4decision of the Commission as provided in this paragraph shall 5be tolled until the arbitrator has determined that the 6petition is sufficient.7    The employer shall, within 15 days after receipt of the 8notice that such petition is filed, file with the Commission 9and serve on the employee or his representative a written 10response to each claim set forth in the petition, including 11the legal and factual basis for each disputed allegation and 12the following information: (i) complete copies of any reports, 13records, documents and affidavits in the possession of the 14employer on which the employer intends to rely in support of 15his response, (ii) a list of any reports, records, documents 16and affidavits which the employer has demanded by subpoena and 17on which the employer intends to rely in support of his 18response, (iii) the name and address of each witness on whom 19the employer will rely to support his response, and (iv) the 20names and addresses of any medical practitioners selected by 21the employer pursuant to Section 12 of this Act and the time 22and place of any examination scheduled to be made pursuant to 23such Section.24    Any employer who does not timely file and serve a written 25response without good cause may not introduce any evidence to 26dispute any claim of the employee but may cross examine the   SB1503- 55 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1employee or any witness brought by the employee and otherwise 2be heard.3    No document or other evidence not previously identified by 4either party with the petition or written response, or by any 5other means before the hearing, may be introduced into 6evidence without good cause. If, at the hearing, material 7information is discovered which was not previously disclosed, 8the Arbitrator may extend the time for closing proof on the 9motion of a party for a reasonable period of time which may be 10more than 30 days. No evidence may be introduced pursuant to 11this paragraph as to permanent disability. No award may be 12entered for permanent disability pursuant to this paragraph. 13Either party may introduce into evidence the testimony taken 14by deposition of any medical practitioner.15    The Commission shall adopt rules, regulations and 16procedures whereby the final decision of the Commission is 17filed not later than 90 days from the date the petition for 18review is filed but in no event later than 180 days from the 19date the petition for an emergency hearing is filed with the 20Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission.21    All service required pursuant to this paragraph (b-1) must 22be by personal service or by certified mail and with evidence 23of receipt. In addition for the purposes of this paragraph, 24all service on the employer must be at the premises where the 25accident occurred if the premises are owned or operated by the 26employer. Otherwise service must be at the employee's   SB1503- 56 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1principal place of employment by the employer. If service on 2the employer is not possible at either of the above, then 3service shall be at the employer's principal place of 4business. After initial service in each case, service shall be 5made on the employer's attorney or designated representative.6    (c)(1) At a reasonable time in advance of and in 7connection with the hearing under Section 19(e) or 19(h), the 8Commission may on its own motion order an impartial physical 9or mental examination of a petitioner whose mental or physical 10condition is in issue, when in the Commission's discretion it 11appears that such an examination will materially aid in the 12just determination of the case. The examination shall be made 13by a member or members of a panel of physicians chosen for 14their special qualifications by the Illinois State Medical 15Society. The Commission shall establish procedures by which a 16physician shall be selected from such list.17    (2) Should the Commission at any time during the hearing 18find that compelling considerations make it advisable to have 19an examination and report at that time, the commission may in 20its discretion so order.21    (3) A copy of the report of examination shall be given to 22the Commission and to the attorneys for the parties.23    (4) Either party or the Commission may call the examining 24physician or physicians to testify. Any physician so called 25shall be subject to cross-examination.26    (5) The examination shall be made, and the physician or   SB1503- 57 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1physicians, if called, shall testify, without cost to the 2parties. The Commission shall determine the compensation and 3the pay of the physician or physicians. The compensation for 4this service shall not exceed the usual and customary amount 5for such service.6    (6) The fees and payment thereof of all attorneys and 7physicians for services authorized by the Commission under 8this Act shall, upon request of either the employer or the 9employee or the beneficiary affected, be subject to the review 10and decision of the Commission.11    (d) If any employee shall persist in insanitary or 12injurious practices which tend to either imperil or retard his 13recovery or shall refuse to submit to such medical, surgical, 14or hospital treatment as is reasonably essential to promote 15his recovery, the Commission may, in its discretion, reduce or 16suspend the compensation of any such injured employee. 17However, when an employer and employee so agree in writing, 18the foregoing provision shall not be construed to authorize 19the reduction or suspension of compensation of an employee who 20is relying in good faith, on treatment by prayer or spiritual 21means alone, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 22recognized church or religious denomination, by a duly 23accredited practitioner thereof.24    (e) This paragraph shall apply to all hearings before the 25Commission. Such hearings may be held in its office or 26elsewhere as the Commission may deem advisable. The taking of   SB1503- 58 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1testimony on such hearings may be had before any member of the 2Commission. If a petition for review and agreed statement of 3facts or transcript of evidence is filed, as provided herein, 4the Commission shall promptly review the decision of the 5Arbitrator and all questions of law or fact which appear from 6the statement of facts or transcript of evidence.7    In all cases in which the hearing before the arbitrator is 8held after December 18, 1989, no additional evidence shall be 9introduced by the parties before the Commission on review of 10the decision of the Arbitrator. In reviewing decisions of an 11arbitrator the Commission shall award such temporary 12compensation, permanent compensation and other payments as are 13due under this Act. The Commission shall file in its office its 14decision thereon, and shall immediately send to each party or 15his attorney a copy of such decision and a notification of the 16time when it was filed. Decisions shall be filed within 60 days 17after the Statement of Exceptions and Supporting Brief and 18Response thereto are required to be filed or oral argument 19whichever is later.20    In the event either party requests oral argument, such 21argument shall be had before a panel of 3 members of the 22Commission (or before all available members pursuant to the 23determination of 7 members of the Commission that such 24argument be held before all available members of the 25Commission) pursuant to the rules and regulations of the 26Commission. A panel of 3 members, which shall be comprised of   SB1503- 59 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1not more than one representative citizen of the employing 2class and not more than one representative from a labor 3organization recognized under the National Labor Relations Act 4or an attorney who has represented labor organizations or has 5represented employees in workers' compensation cases, shall 6hear the argument; provided that if all the issues in dispute 7are solely the nature and extent of the permanent partial 8disability, if any, a majority of the panel may deny the 9request for such argument and such argument shall not be held; 10and provided further that 7 members of the Commission may 11determine that the argument be held before all available 12members of the Commission. A decision of the Commission shall 13be approved by a majority of Commissioners present at such 14hearing if any; provided, if no such hearing is held, a 15decision of the Commission shall be approved by a majority of a 16panel of 3 members of the Commission as described in this 17Section. The Commission shall give 10 days' notice to the 18parties or their attorneys of the time and place of such taking 19of testimony and of such argument.20    In any case the Commission in its decision may find 21specially upon any question or questions of law or fact which 22shall be submitted in writing by either party whether ultimate 23or otherwise; provided that on issues other than nature and 24extent of the disability, if any, the Commission in its 25decision shall find specially upon any question or questions 26of law or fact, whether ultimate or otherwise, which are   SB1503- 60 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1submitted in writing by either party; provided further that 2not more than 5 such questions may be submitted by either 3party. Any party may, within 20 days after receipt of notice of 4the Commission's decision, or within such further time, not 5exceeding 30 days, as the Commission may grant, file with the 6Commission either an agreed statement of the facts appearing 7upon the hearing, or, if such party shall so elect, a correct 8transcript of evidence of the additional proceedings presented 9before the Commission, in which report the party may embody a 10correct statement of such other proceedings in the case as 11such party may desire to have reviewed, such statement of 12facts or transcript of evidence to be authenticated by the 13signature of the parties or their attorneys, and in the event 14that they do not agree, then the authentication of such 15transcript of evidence shall be by the signature of any member 16of the Commission.17    If a reporter does not for any reason furnish a transcript 18of the proceedings before the Arbitrator in any case for use on 19a hearing for review before the Commission, within the 20limitations of time as fixed in this Section, the Commission 21may, in its discretion, order a trial de novo before the 22Commission in such case upon application of either party. The 23applications for adjustment of claim and other documents in 24the nature of pleadings filed by either party, together with 25the decisions of the Arbitrator and of the Commission and the 26statement of facts or transcript of evidence hereinbefore   SB1503- 61 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1provided for in paragraphs (b) and (c) shall be the record of 2the proceedings of the Commission, and shall be subject to 3review as hereinafter provided.4    At the request of either party or on its own motion, the 5Commission shall set forth in writing the reasons for the 6decision, including findings of fact and conclusions of law 7separately stated. The Commission shall by rule adopt a format 8for written decisions for the Commission and arbitrators. The 9written decisions shall be concise and shall succinctly state 10the facts and reasons for the decision. The Commission may 11adopt in whole or in part, the decision of the arbitrator as 12the decision of the Commission. When the Commission does so 13adopt the decision of the arbitrator, it shall do so by order. 14Whenever the Commission adopts part of the arbitrator's 15decision, but not all, it shall include in the order the 16reasons for not adopting all of the arbitrator's decision. 17When a majority of a panel, after deliberation, has arrived at 18its decision, the decision shall be filed as provided in this 19Section without unnecessary delay, and without regard to the 20fact that a member of the panel has expressed an intention to 21dissent. Any member of the panel may file a dissent. Any 22dissent shall be filed no later than 10 days after the decision 23of the majority has been filed.24    Decisions rendered by the Commission and dissents, if any, 25shall be published together by the Commission. The conclusions 26of law set out in such decisions shall be regarded as   SB1503- 62 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1precedents by arbitrators for the purpose of achieving a more 2uniform administration of this Act.3    (f) The decision of the Commission acting within its 4powers, according to the provisions of paragraph (d) of 5Section 4 and paragraph (e) of this Section shall, in the 6absence of fraud, be conclusive unless reviewed as in this 7paragraph hereinafter provided. However, the Arbitrator or the 8Commission may on his or its own motion, or on the motion of 9either party, correct any clerical error or errors in 10computation within 15 days after the date of receipt of any 11award by such Arbitrator or any decision on review of the 12Commission and shall have the power to recall the original 13award on arbitration or decision on review, and issue in lieu 14thereof such corrected award or decision. Where such 15correction is made the time for review herein specified shall 16begin to run from the date of the receipt of the corrected 17award or decision.18        (1) Except in cases of claims against the State of 19    Illinois other than those claims under Section 18.1, in 20    which case the decision of the Commission shall not be 21    subject to judicial review, the Circuit Court of the 22    county where any of the parties defendant may be found, or 23    if none of the parties defendant can be found in this State 24    then the Circuit Court of the county where the accident 25    occurred, shall by summons to the Commission have power to 26    review all questions of law and fact presented by such   SB1503- 63 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    record.2        A proceeding for review shall be commenced within 20 3    days of the receipt of notice of the decision of the 4    Commission. The summons shall be issued by the clerk of 5    such court upon written request returnable on a designated 6    return day, not less than 10 or more than 60 days from the 7    date of issuance thereof, and the written request shall 8    contain the last known address of other parties in 9    interest and their attorneys of record who are to be 10    served by summons. Service upon any member of the 11    Commission or the Secretary or the Assistant Secretary 12    thereof shall be service upon the Commission, and service 13    upon other parties in interest and their attorneys of 14    record shall be by summons, and such service shall be made 15    upon the Commission and other parties in interest by 16    mailing notices of the commencement of the proceedings and 17    the return day of the summons to the office of the 18    Commission and to the last known place of residence of 19    other parties in interest or their attorney or attorneys 20    of record. The clerk of the court issuing the summons 21    shall on the day of issue mail notice of the commencement 22    of the proceedings which shall be done by mailing a copy of 23    the summons to the office of the Commission, and a copy of 24    the summons to the other parties in interest or their 25    attorney or attorneys of record and the clerk of the court 26    shall make certificate that he has so sent said notices in   SB1503- 64 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    pursuance of this Section, which shall be evidence of 2    service on the Commission and other parties in interest.3        The Commission shall not be required to certify the 4    record of their proceedings to the Circuit Court, unless 5    the party commencing the proceedings for review in the 6    Circuit Court as above provided, shall file with the 7    Commission notice of intent to file for review in Circuit 8    Court. It shall be the duty of the Commission upon such 9    filing of notice of intent to file for review in the 10    Circuit Court to prepare a true and correct copy of such 11    testimony and a true and correct copy of all other matters 12    contained in such record and certified to by the Secretary 13    or Assistant Secretary thereof. The changes made to this 14    subdivision (f)(1) by this amendatory Act of the 98th 15    General Assembly apply to any Commission decision entered 16    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 17    98th General Assembly. 18        No request for a summons may be filed and no summons 19    shall issue unless the party seeking to review the 20    decision of the Commission shall exhibit to the clerk of 21    the Circuit Court proof of filing with the Commission of 22    the notice of the intent to file for review in the Circuit 23    Court or an affidavit of the attorney setting forth that 24    notice of intent to file for review in the Circuit Court 25    has been given in writing to the Secretary or Assistant 26    Secretary of the Commission.  SB1503- 65 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1        (2) No such summons shall issue unless the one against 2    whom the Commission shall have rendered an award for the 3    payment of money shall upon the filing of his written 4    request for such summons file with the clerk of the court a 5    bond conditioned that if he shall not successfully 6    prosecute the review, he will pay the award and the costs 7    of the proceedings in the courts. The amount of the bond 8    shall be fixed by any member of the Commission and the 9    surety or sureties of the bond shall be approved by the 10    clerk of the court. The acceptance of the bond by the clerk 11    of the court shall constitute evidence of his approval of 12    the bond.13        The following shall not be required to file a bond to 14    secure the payment of the award and the costs of the 15    proceedings in the court to authorize the court to issue 16    such summons:17            (1) the State Treasurer, for a fund administered 18        by the State Treasurer ex officio against whom the 19        Commission shall have rendered an award for the 20        payment of money; and21            (2) a county, city, town, township, incorporated 22        village, school district, body politic, or municipal 23        corporation against whom the Commission shall have 24        rendered an award for the payment of money. 25        The court may confirm or set aside the decision of the 26    Commission. If the decision is set aside and the facts   SB1503- 66 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    found in the proceedings before the Commission are 2    sufficient, the court may enter such decision as is 3    justified by law, or may remand the cause to the 4    Commission for further proceedings and may state the 5    questions requiring further hearing, and give such other 6    instructions as may be proper. If the court affirms the 7    Commission's decision imposing fines on the employer under 8    subsection (d) of Section 4, the court shall enter 9    judgment against the employer in the amount of the fines 10    assessed by the Commission. Appeals shall be taken to the 11    Appellate Court in accordance with Supreme Court Rules 12    22(g) and 303. Appeals shall be taken from the Appellate 13    Court to the Supreme Court in accordance with Supreme 14    Court Rule 315.15        It shall be the duty of the clerk of any court 16    rendering a decision affecting or affirming an award of 17    the Commission to promptly furnish the Commission with a 18    copy of such decision, without charge.19        The decision of a majority of the members of the panel 20    of the Commission, shall be considered the decision of the 21    Commission.22    (g) Except in the case of a claim against the State of 23Illinois, either party may present a certified copy of the 24award of the Arbitrator, or a certified copy of the decision of 25the Commission when the same has become final, when no 26proceedings for review are pending, providing for the payment   SB1503- 67 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1of compensation according to this Act, to the Circuit Court of 2the county in which such accident occurred or either of the 3parties are residents, whereupon the court shall enter a 4judgment in accordance therewith. In a case where the employer 5refuses to pay compensation according to such final award or 6such final decision upon which such judgment is entered the 7court shall in entering judgment thereon, tax as costs against 8him the reasonable costs and attorney fees in the arbitration 9proceedings and in the court entering the judgment for the 10person in whose favor the judgment is entered, which judgment 11and costs taxed as therein provided shall, until and unless 12set aside, have the same effect as though duly entered in an 13action duly tried and determined by the court, and shall with 14like effect, be entered and docketed. The Circuit Court shall 15have power at any time upon application to make any such 16judgment conform to any modification required by any 17subsequent decision of the Supreme Court upon appeal, or as 18the result of any subsequent proceedings for review, as 19provided in this Act.20    Judgment shall not be entered until 15 days' notice of the 21time and place of the application for the entry of judgment 22shall be served upon the employer by filing such notice with 23the Commission, which Commission shall, in case it has on file 24the address of the employer or the name and address of its 25agent upon whom notices may be served, immediately send a copy 26of the notice to the employer or such designated agent.  SB1503- 68 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1    (h) An agreement or award under this Act providing for 2compensation in installments, may at any time within 18 months 3after such agreement or award be reviewed by the Commission at 4the request of either the employer or the employee, on the 5ground that the disability of the employee has subsequently 6recurred, increased, diminished or ended.7    However, as to accidents occurring subsequent to July 1, 81955, which are covered by any agreement or award under this 9Act providing for compensation in installments made as a 10result of such accident, such agreement or award may at any 11time within 30 months, or 60 months in the case of an award 12under Section 8(d)1, after such agreement or award be reviewed 13by the Commission at the request of either the employer or the 14employee on the ground that the disability of the employee has 15subsequently recurred, increased, diminished or ended.16    On such review, compensation payments may be 17re-established, increased, diminished or ended. The Commission 18shall give 15 days' notice to the parties of the hearing for 19review. Any employee, upon any petition for such review being 20filed by the employer, shall be entitled to one day's notice 21for each 100 miles necessary to be traveled by him in attending 22the hearing of the Commission upon the petition, and 3 days in 23addition thereto. Such employee shall, at the discretion of 24the Commission, also be entitled to 5 cents per mile 25necessarily traveled by him within the State of Illinois in 26attending such hearing, not to exceed a distance of 300 miles,   SB1503- 69 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1to be taxed by the Commission as costs and deposited with the 2petition of the employer.3    When compensation which is payable in accordance with an 4award or settlement contract approved by the Commission, is 5ordered paid in a lump sum by the Commission, no review shall 6be had as in this paragraph mentioned.7    (i) Each party, upon taking any proceedings or steps 8whatsoever before any Arbitrator, Commission or court, shall 9file with the Commission his address, or the name and address 10of any agent upon whom all notices to be given to such party 11shall be served, either personally or by registered mail, 12addressed to such party or agent at the last address so filed 13with the Commission. In the event such party has not filed his 14address, or the name and address of an agent as above provided, 15service of any notice may be had by filing such notice with the 16Commission.17    (j) Whenever in any proceeding testimony has been taken or 18a final decision has been rendered and after the taking of such 19testimony or after such decision has become final, the injured 20employee dies, then in any subsequent proceedings brought by 21the personal representative or beneficiaries of the deceased 22employee, such testimony in the former proceeding may be 23introduced with the same force and effect as though the 24witness having so testified were present in person in such 25subsequent proceedings and such final decision, if any, shall 26be taken as final adjudication of any of the issues which are   SB1503- 70 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1the same in both proceedings.2    (k) In case where there has been any unreasonable or 3vexatious delay of payment or intentional underpayment of 4compensation, or proceedings have been instituted or carried 5on by the one liable to pay the compensation, which do not 6present a real controversy, but are merely frivolous or for 7delay, then the Commission may award compensation additional 8to that otherwise payable under this Act equal to 50% of the 9amount payable at the time of such award. Failure to pay 10compensation in accordance with the provisions of Section 8, 11paragraph (b) of this Act, shall be considered unreasonable 12delay.13    When determining whether this subsection (k) shall apply, 14the Commission shall consider whether an Arbitrator has 15determined that the claim is not compensable or whether the 16employer has made payments under Section 8(j).17    (l) If the employee has made written demand for payment of 18benefits under Section 8(a) or Section 8(b), the employer 19shall have 14 days after receipt of the demand to set forth in 20writing the reason for the delay. In the case of demand for 21payment of medical benefits under Section 8(a), the time for 22the employer to respond shall not commence until the 23expiration of the allotted 30 days specified under Section 248.2(d). In case the employer or his or her insurance carrier 25shall without good and just cause fail, neglect, refuse, or 26unreasonably delay the payment of benefits under Section 8(a)   SB1503- 71 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1or Section 8(b), the Arbitrator or the Commission shall allow 2to the employee additional compensation in the sum of $30 per 3day for each day that the benefits under Section 8(a) or 4Section 8(b) have been so withheld or refused, not to exceed 5$10,000. A delay in payment of 14 days or more shall create a 6rebuttable presumption of unreasonable delay. 7    (m) If the commission finds that an accidental injury was 8directly and proximately caused by the employer's wilful 9violation of a health and safety standard under the Health and 10Safety Act or the Occupational Safety and Health Act in force 11at the time of the accident, the arbitrator or the Commission 12shall allow to the injured employee or his dependents, as the 13case may be, additional compensation equal to 25% of the 14amount which otherwise would be payable under the provisions 15of this Act exclusive of this paragraph. The additional 16compensation herein provided shall be allowed by an 17appropriate increase in the applicable weekly compensation 18rate.19    (n) After June 30, 1984, decisions of the Illinois 20Workers' Compensation Commission reviewing an award of an 21arbitrator of the Commission shall draw interest at a rate 22equal to the yield on indebtedness issued by the United States 23Government with a 26-week maturity next previously auctioned 24on the day on which the decision is filed. Said rate of 25interest shall be set forth in the Arbitrator's Decision. 26Interest shall be drawn from the date of the arbitrator's   SB1503- 72 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1award on all accrued compensation due the employee through the 2day prior to the date of payments. However, when an employee 3appeals an award of an Arbitrator or the Commission, and the 4appeal results in no change or a decrease in the award, 5interest shall not further accrue from the date of such 6appeal.7    The employer or his insurance carrier may tender the 8payments due under the award to stop the further accrual of 9interest on such award notwithstanding the prosecution by 10either party of review, certiorari, appeal to the Supreme 11Court or other steps to reverse, vacate or modify the award.12    (o) By the 15th day of each month each insurer providing 13coverage for losses under this Act shall notify each insured 14employer of any compensable claim incurred during the 15preceding month and the amounts paid or reserved on the claim 16including a summary of the claim and a brief statement of the 17reasons for compensability. A cumulative report of all claims 18incurred during a calendar year or continued from the previous 19year shall be furnished to the insured employer by the insurer 20within 30 days after the end of that calendar year.21    The insured employer may challenge, in proceeding before 22the Commission, payments made by the insurer without 23arbitration and payments made after a case is determined to be 24noncompensable. If the Commission finds that the case was not 25compensable, the insurer shall purge its records as to that 26employer of any loss or expense associated with the claim,   SB1503- 73 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1reimburse the employer for attorneys' fees arising from the 2challenge and for any payment required of the employer to the 3Rate Adjustment Fund or the Second Injury Fund, and may not 4reflect the loss or expense for rate making purposes. The 5employee shall not be required to refund the challenged 6payment. The decision of the Commission may be reviewed in the 7same manner as in arbitrated cases. No challenge may be 8initiated under this paragraph more than 3 years after the 9payment is made. An employer may waive the right of challenge 10under this paragraph on a case by case basis.11    (p) After filing an application for adjustment of claim 12but prior to the hearing on arbitration the parties may 13voluntarily agree to submit such application for adjustment of 14claim for decision by an arbitrator under this subsection (p) 15where such application for adjustment of claim raises only a 16dispute over temporary total disability, permanent partial 17disability or medical expenses. Such agreement shall be in 18writing in such form as provided by the Commission. 19Applications for adjustment of claim submitted for decision by 20an arbitrator under this subsection (p) shall proceed 21according to rule as established by the Commission. The 22Commission shall promulgate rules including, but not limited 23to, rules to ensure that the parties are adequately informed 24of their rights under this subsection (p) and of the voluntary 25nature of proceedings under this subsection (p). The findings 26of fact made by an arbitrator acting within his or her powers   SB1503- 74 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1under this subsection (p) in the absence of fraud shall be 2conclusive. However, the arbitrator may on his own motion, or 3the motion of either party, correct any clerical errors or 4errors in computation within 15 days after the date of receipt 5of such award of the arbitrator and shall have the power to 6recall the original award on arbitration, and issue in lieu 7thereof such corrected award. The decision of the arbitrator 8under this subsection (p) shall be considered the decision of 9the Commission and proceedings for review of questions of law 10arising from the decision may be commenced by either party 11pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 19. The Advisory Board 12established under Section 13.1 shall compile a list of 13certified Commission arbitrators, each of whom shall be 14approved by at least 7 members of the Advisory Board. The 15chairman shall select 5 persons from such list to serve as 16arbitrators under this subsection (p). By agreement, the 17parties shall select one arbitrator from among the 5 persons 18selected by the chairman except that if the parties do not 19agree on an arbitrator from among the 5 persons, the parties 20may, by agreement, select an arbitrator of the American 21Arbitration Association, whose fee shall be paid by the State 22in accordance with rules promulgated by the Commission. 23Arbitration under this subsection (p) shall be voluntary.24    (q) Within 60 days after receipt of service of notice of 25preliminary proceedings before an Arbitrator, an employer 26shall disclose documents sufficient to calculate a   SB1503- 75 -LRB104 08239 SPS 18289 b1petitioner's average weekly wage.2(Source: P.A. 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 103-590, eff. 6-5-24.)